Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-315
Special committee; membership.

The commission shall administer the Telecommunications Relay System Act with the advice of a special committee appointed by the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing. The special committee shall consist of seven members as follows: One member shall be a deaf person; one member shall be a deaf or hard of hearing person; one member shall be a speech-impaired person; one member shall represent the Public Service Commission; one member shall represent the telephone industry; one member shall represent the Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing; and one member shall represent the public.

Laws 1990, LB 240, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 86-906;

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 29;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 28;

Laws 1999, LB 359, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1307;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 193.